test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_aaad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    saddađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: saddaa
    vardađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vardaa
    arvađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: arvaa
    pavŋađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pavŋaa
    tarrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tarrajeh
    ramččađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ramččajeh
    stanccađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stanccaam
    parfađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: parfaam
    jaŋgađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jaŋgaam
    njaŋgađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njaŋgaam
    puohađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puohaam
    harjađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: harjaam
    lakkađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lakkaam
    salkkađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: salkkaam
    virkkađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: virkkaam
    kaŋkkađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaŋkkaam
    taŋkkađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: taŋkkaam
    pallađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pallaam
    meinađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: meinaam
    vannađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vannaam
    skarppađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skarppaam
    avrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: avraam
    kavrađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kavraam
    lastađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lastaam
    tekstađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tekstaam
    velttađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: velttaam
    starttađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: starttaam
    kaivađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaivaam
    veivađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: veivaam
    njavvađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: njavvaam
    harttađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: harttaam
    harttađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: harttaa
    pakkađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pakkaam
    pakkađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pakkajeh
    ramččađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ramččaam
    ramččađ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ramččajeh
